Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2719.02
Insurer under court order; provisions applicable; act; applicability.

(1) Any insurer under an order of liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation on February 12, 1986, shall be subject to the provisions of the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act in effect on the day prior to February 12, 1986.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the provisions of the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act in effect on the date the association first becomes obligated for the policies or contracts of an insolvent or impaired member govern the association's rights or obligations to the policyowners, contract owners, or enrollees of the insolvent or impaired member insurer.

Laws 1986, LB 593, § 15;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 19;

Laws 2019, LB159, § 10.